Illinois, session 104th, HB1262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 25-75 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/25-75)7    Sec. 25-75. Purchase of motor vehicles.8    (a) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 9of the 94th General Assembly, all gasoline-powered vehicles 10purchased from State funds must be flexible fuel vehicles. 11Beginning July 1, 2007, all gasoline-powered vehicles 12purchased from State funds must be flexible fuel or fuel 13efficient hybrid vehicles. For purposes of this Section, 14"flexible fuel vehicles" are automobiles or light trucks that 15operate on either gasoline or E-85 (85% ethanol, 15% gasoline) 16fuel, excluding authorized emergency vehicles, and "Fuel 17efficient hybrid vehicles" are automobiles or light trucks 18that use a gasoline or diesel engine and an electric motor to 19provide power and gain at least a 20% increase in combined 20US-EPA city-highway fuel economy over the equivalent or 21most-similar conventionally-powered model, excluding 22authorized emergency vehicles.23    (b) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act   HB1262- 2 -LRB104 06005 LNS 16038 b1of the 94th General Assembly, any vehicle purchased from State 2funds that is fueled by diesel fuel shall be certified by the 3manufacturer to run on 5% biodiesel (B5) fuel.4    (b-5) On and after January 1, 2016, 15% of passenger 5vehicles, other than Department of Corrections vehicles, 6Secretary of State vehicles (except for mid-sized sedans), and 7Illinois State Police patrol vehicles, purchased with State 8funds shall be vehicles fueled by electricity, electricity and 9gasohol (hybrids or plug-in hybrids), compressed natural gas, 10liquid petroleum gas, or liquid natural gas, including 11dedicated or non-dedicated fuel type vehicles. 12    (c) The Chief Procurement Officer may determine that 13certain vehicle procurements are exempt from this Section 14based on intended use or other reasonable considerations such 15as health and safety of Illinois citizens.16(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)